Louisiana, session 2026, HB37.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 19:2 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2. Expropriation by state or certain corporations, limited liability companies, or
other legal entities
A. Prior to filing an expropriation suit, an expropriating authority shall
attempt in good faith to reach an agreement as to compensation with the owner of the
property sought to be taken and comply with all of the requirements of R.S. 19:2.2.
If unable to reach an agreement with the owner as to compensation, any of the
following may expropriate needed property:
(1) The state or its political corporations or subdivisions created for the
purpose of exercising any state governmental powers.
(2) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for, or engaged in, the construction of railroads, toll roads, or
navigation canals.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-222 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 37
(3) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for, or engaged in, the construction or operation of street
railways, urban railways, or inter-urban railways.
(4) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for, or engaged in, the construction or operation of waterworks,
filtration and treating plants, or sewerage plants to supply the public with water and
sewerage.
(5) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for, or engaged in, the piping and marketing of natural gas for the
purpose of supplying the public with natural gas as a common carrier or contract
carrier or any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity which is or will be a natural gas company or an intrastate natural gas
transporter as defined by federal or state law, composed entirely of such entities or
composed of the wholly owned subsidiaries of such entities. As used in this
Paragraph, "contract carrier" means any legal entity that transports natural gas for
compensation or hire pursuant to special contract or agreement with unaffiliated third
parties.
(6) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for the purpose of, or engaged in, transmitting intelligence by
telegraph or telephone.
(7) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for the purpose of, or engaged in, generating, transmitting, and
distributing or for transmitting or distributing electricity and steam for power,
lighting, heating, or other such uses subject to the following qualifications. Property
located in Louisiana may be expropriated exclusively by an electric public utility as
defined in R.S. 45:121 or an affiliated entity either for a transmission or generation
project that is approved and included in a multistate regional transmission
organization's or independent system operator's transmission expansion plan or
identified by such regional transmission organization or independent system operator
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-222 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 37
as necessary for the reliability of the electric system or necessary for the
interconnection of a generator, or for generating plants, buildings, transmission lines,
stations or substations, distribution lines, or other associated facilities if a majority
of the electricity or steam power to be generated, transmitted, or distributed in
connection with these intended facilities will be delivered to end-users located within
Louisiana. The generating plants, buildings, transmission lines, stations, and
substations expropriated or for which property was expropriated shall be so located,
constructed, operated, and maintained as not to be dangerous to persons or property
nor interfere with the use of the wires of other wire using companies or, more than
is necessary, with the convenience of the landowners. The terms "Regional
Transmission Organization" and "Independent System Operator" shall have the
meanings provided by 16 U.S.C. 796. In the event that any provision or provisions
of this Paragraph are declared invalid or unenforceable by any court of competent
jurisdiction, the remaining terms and provisions that are not affected thereby shall
remain in full force and effect.
(8) All persons included in the definition of common carrier pipelines as set
forth in R.S. 45:251.
(9) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for the purpose of, or engaged in, piping or marketing of coal or
lignite in whatever form or mixture convenient for transportation within a pipeline
as otherwise provided for in R.S. 30:721 through 723.
(10) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for the purpose of, or engaged in, the piping or marketing of
carbon dioxide for use in connection with a secondary or tertiary recovery project for
the enhanced recovery of liquid or gaseous hydrocarbons approved by the
commissioner of conservation, or created for the purpose of, or engaged in, the
transportation of carbon dioxide by pipeline for underground storage, including but
not limited to through connecting to an existing pipeline transporting carbon dioxide
for underground storage, whether owned or operated by the same entity, and which
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-222 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 37
has received a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 30:1107(B). Property located in Louisiana may be so
expropriated for the transportation of carbon dioxide for underground injection in
connection with such projects located in Louisiana or in other states or jurisdictions.
(11) Any domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other
legal entity created for the purpose of, or engaged in, the injection of carbon dioxide
for the underground storage of carbon dioxide and that has received a certificate of
public convenience and necessity pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 30:1107(A).
Property located in Louisiana may be so expropriated for the underground storage
of carbon dioxide in connection with such storage facility projects located in
Louisiana, including but not limited to surface and subsurface rights, mineral rights,
and other property interests necessary or useful for the purpose of constructing,
operating, or modifying a carbon dioxide storage facility. This Paragraph shall not
allow for the expropriation of reservoir storage rights for geologic storage of carbon
dioxide, except in connection with any project as to which R.S. 30:1108(B)(2) is
applicable. This Paragraph shall have no effect on nor does it grant expropriation of
the mineral rights or other property rights associated with the approvals required for
injection of carbon dioxide into enhanced recovery projects approved by the
commissioner under R.S. 30:4.
(12) Subject to any applicable limitations in this Section, any domestic or
foreign corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity created for the
purpose of, or engaged in, any of the activities otherwise provided for in this Section.
B. The provisions of this Title shall not apply to any foreign corporation,
limited liability company, or other legal entity not incorporated or registered to do
business under the laws of any state or territory of the United States or the District
of Columbia.
C. The provisions of this Title shall not apply to any foreign corporation,
limited liability company, or other legal entity whose country of primary ownership
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-222 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 37
or incorporation does not have a reciprocal expropriation agreement with the United
States.